Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.660.060

Employment of certain personnel not affected.

School districts or approved private schools' ability to employ personnel under certification for emergency or temporary, substitute, or provisional duty as authorized by chapter 28A.410 RCW are not affected by the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2001 c 158 s 10.]